Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1472.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 38-294, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-294. Resignations Resignations shall be in writing and made as follows: 1. By members of the legislature, to the presiding officer of the body of which the legislator is a member, who shall immediately transmit the resignation to the governor. 2. By state officers and officers of the militia, to the governor. 3. By other officers commissioned by the governor, to the governor. 4. By county officers, to the chairman of the board of supervisors of their county. 5. By the chairman of the board of supervisors, to the county recorder of the county. 6. By the mayor or the council members of a city or town, to the clerk of the city or town. 6. 7. In cases not otherwise provided for, by filing the resignation in the office of the secretary of state. 7. 8. By appointive officers, to the body or officer that appointed them, unless otherwise provided. END_STATUTE